Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 60. Property Insurance Contracts.

Sec. 21.60.010.
Over-insurance prohibited.

Over-insurance shall be considered to exist if property or an insurable interest in property is insured by one or more insurance contracts against the same hazard in an amount in excess of the fair value of the property or of the interest, as determined on the effective date of the insurance or the renewal of it.

A person may not knowingly issue, place, procure, or accept an insurance contract that would result in over-insurance of the property or interest in the property proposed to be insured, except as provided in AS

21.60.020

.

Each violation of this section shall subject the violator to the penalties provided in AS

21.97.020

.

In this section the term “fair value” means the cost of replacement less depreciation that is properly applicable to the subject insured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 76 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was formerly (b) and subsections (b) and (c) were formerly (c) and (d).
Relettered in 2010.
In 2010, in subsection (c), “AS

21.97.020

” was substituted for “AS 21.90.020” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.90.020.

Sec. 21.60.020.
Replacement insurance.

By a contract of insurance of property or of any insurable interest in the property, the insurer may in connection with a special provision or endorsement made a part of the policy insure the cost of repair or replacement of the property, if damaged or destroyed by a hazard insured against, and without deduction of depreciation, subject to reasonable regulations that may be adopted by the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)